Illinois, session 104th, HB4472.
Be it enacted by the People of the State of Illinois, 3represented in the General Assembly: 4    Section 5. The Secretary of State Act is amended by adding 5Section 38 as follows: 6    (15 ILCS 305/38 new)7    Sec. 38. Blue Envelope Program.8    (a) The Secretary of State, in consultation with a 9nonprofit organization that advocates for autistic individuals 10in this State, shall establish a program to be known as the 11Blue Envelope Program through which the Office of the 12Secretary of State shall design and make publicly available 13blue envelopes that may be used by individuals who have been 14diagnosed with autism spectrum disorder to hold documents 15required for the operation of a motor vehicle, including, but 16not limited to, the individual's driver's license and 17insurance card.18    (b) The envelopes designed and made publicly available 19under subsection (a) shall:20        (1) provide written information on the outside of the 21    envelope that identifies the holder of the envelope as an 22    individual who has been diagnosed with autism spectrum 23    disorder;  HB4472 Enrolled- 2 -LRB104 16524 SPS 29920 b1        (2) provide written guidance to assist law enforcement 2    officers in effectively communicating with an individual 3    who has been diagnosed with autism spectrum disorder; and4        (3) include an area on the envelope where the 5    individual may provide emergency contact information.6    (c) The Office of the Secretary of State shall make the 7envelopes designed under subsection (a) publicly available at 8Driver Services facilities and the Illinois State Library. 9Upon request, the Secretary shall distribute the developed 10envelopes to State and local law enforcement agencies, fire 11departments, and libraries.12    (d) An individual diagnosed with autism spectrum disorder 13may voluntarily participate in the program established under 14this Section. Any information provided on the outside of the 15envelope shall be used solely to support safe and effective 16communication during interactions with first responders and 17law enforcement officers and shall not be entered into any 18federal, State, or local database. This subsection shall not 19be construed to prohibit the issuance of a citation under 20Section 6-308 of the Illinois Vehicle Code.21    (e) The Secretary of State may adopt rules to implement 22and administer this Section.